District of Columbia statutes.
32-1203

Effect of leave on employment benefits or seniority.

An employee who takes leave pursuant to § 32-1202 shall not lose any employment benefit or seniority accrued before or during the date of such leave.

History

Aug. 17, 1994, D.C. Law 10-146, § 4, 41 DCR 4477

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1603.